Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 7A.3, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 2. Section 8A.202, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 3. Section 8A.202, subsection 1, paragraph k, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: k. Establish and administer standards for state agency libraries and public libraries. Sec. 4. Section 8A.204, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 5. Section 8A.209, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. An enrich Iowa program is established in the department to provide direct state assistance to public libraries, to support the open access and access plus interlibrary loan programs, to provide public libraries with an incentive to improve library services that are in compliance with performance measures, and to reduce inequities among communities in the delivery of library services based on performance measures adopted by rule by the department. The department shall adopt rules governing the allocation of moneys appropriated by the general assembly for purposes of this Senate File 213, p. 2 section to provide direct state assistance to eligible public libraries. A public library is eligible for moneys under this subchapter if it is in compliance with the departmentâs performance measures. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 213, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor